California statutes. Probate Code
11703.

The Attorney General shall be deemed to be a person entitled to distribution of the estate for purposes of this chapter if the estate involves or may involve any of the following:

(a) A charitable trust, other than a charitable trust with a designated trustee that may lawfully accept the trust.

(b) A devise for a charitable purpose without an identified beneficiary.

(c) An escheat to the State of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11704.

(a) The court shall consider as evidence in the proceeding any statement made in a petition filed under Section 11700 and any statement of interest filed under Section 11702. The court shall not hear or consider a petition filed after the time prescribed in Section 11700.

 (b) (1) The personal representative may petition the court for authorization to participate, as necessary to assist the court, in the proceeding. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given to the persons identified in Section 11701 in the manner provided in Section 1220.

(2) The court may grant or deny this petition, in whole or in part, on the pleadings, without an evidentiary hearing or further discovery. A petition filed pursuant to this subdivision may be granted only upon a showing of good cause. The court shall
 determine the manner and capacity in which the personal representative may provide assistance in the proceeding. The court may direct the personal representative to file papers as a party to the proceeding, or to take other specified action, if deemed by the court to be necessary to assist the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   (AB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11705.

(a) The court shall make an order that determines the persons entitled to distribution of the decedent’s estate and specifies their shares.

(b) When the court order becomes final it binds and is conclusive as to the rights of all interested persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Distribution of Property in Estate [11750. - 11754.]

11750.

(a) The personal representative is responsible for distribution of the property in the estate in compliance with the terms of the court order for distribution.

(b) A distributee may demand, sue for, and recover from the personal representative or any person in possession, property to which the distributee is entitled.

(c) A distribution of property made in compliance with the terms of the court order for distribution is valid as to a person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.

The personal representative shall obtain the receipt of the distributee for property in the estate distributed by the personal representative. In the case of real property, the personal representative shall record the court order for distribution or the personal representative’s deed or both in the county in which the real property is located. Recordation of the order or deed is deemed to be a receipt of the distributee for the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.

If personal property in the possession of a distributee is subject to possession by the distributee for life only, the personal representative shall demand an inventory of the property from the distributee. On receipt, the personal representative shall file the inventory with the court and deliver a copy to any distributee of the remainder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.

(a) Distribution in compliance with the court order entitles the personal representative to a full discharge with respect to property included in the order.

(b) The personal representative shall, before or at the time of the petition for discharge, file receipts for all property in the estate. In the case of real property, the personal representative shall file a statement that identifies the date and place of the recording and other appropriate recording information for the court order for distribution or the personal representative’s deed.

(c) The court may excuse the filing of a receipt on a showing that the personal representative is unable, after reasonable effort, to obtain a receipt and that the property has been delivered to or is in the possession of the distributee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.

Expenses of administration of the estate shall include reasonable storage, delivery, and shipping costs for distribution of tangible personal property to a distributee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Deceased Distributee [11801. - 11802.]

11801.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the share in a decedent’s estate of a beneficiary who survives the decedent but who dies before distribution shall be distributed under this chapter with the same effect as though the distribution were made to the beneficiary while living.

(b) Subject to Section 21525, distribution may not be made under this chapter if the decedent’s will provides that the beneficiary is entitled to take under the will only if the beneficiary survives the date of distribution or other period stated in the will and the beneficiary fails to survive the date of distribution or other period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11802.

If a beneficiary satisfies the requirement of Section 11801, the beneficiary’s share in the decedent’s estate shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, distribution shall be made to the personal representative of the estate of the beneficiary for the purpose of administration in the estate of the beneficiary.

(b) If the beneficiary was issue of the decedent and died intestate while under the age of majority and not having been emancipated, distribution shall be made directly to the heirs of the beneficiary without administration in the estate of the beneficiary.

(c) If a person entitled to the beneficiary’s share proceeds under Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000) (disposition of estate without administration), distribution shall be made under Division 8.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Deposit with County Treasurer [11850. - 11854.]

11850.

Subject to Section 11851, the personal representative may deposit property to be distributed with the county treasurer of the county in which the proceedings are pending in the name of the distributee in any of the following cases:

(a) The property remains in the possession of the personal representative unclaimed or the whereabouts of the distributee is unknown.

(b) The distributee refuses to give a receipt for the property.

(c) The distributee is a minor or incompetent person who has no guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary to receive the property or person authorized to give a receipt for the property.

(d) For any other reason the property cannot be distributed, and the personal representative desires discharge. Notwithstanding Section 11851, deposit may not be made under this subdivision except on court order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11851.

(a) If property authorized by Section 11850 to be deposited with the county treasurer consists of money, the personal representative may deposit the money.

(b) If property authorized by Section 11850 to be deposited with the county treasurer consists of personal property other than money, the personal representative may not deposit the personal property except on court order. If it appears to the court that sale is for the benefit of interested persons, the court shall order the personal property sold, and the proceeds of sale, less expenses of sale allowed by the court, shall be deposited in the county treasury. If it appears to the court that sale is not for the benefit of interested persons, the court shall order the personal property deposited with the Controller, to be held subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11900).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11852.

The county treasurer shall give a receipt for a deposit made under this chapter and is liable on the official bond of the county treasurer for the money deposited. The receipt has the same effect as if executed by the distributee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11853.

If money is deposited or is already on deposit with the county treasurer, the personal representative shall deliver to the county treasurer a certified copy of the order for distribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11854.

(a) A person may claim money on deposit in the county treasury by filing a petition with the court that made the order for distribution. The petition shall show the person’s claim or right to the property. Unless the petition is filed by the person named in the decree for distribution of a decedent’s estate, or the legal representative of the person or the person’s estate, the petition shall state the facts required to be stated in a petition for escheated property filed under Section 1355 of the Code of Civil Procedure. On the filing of the petition, the same proceedings shall be had as are required by that section, except that the hearing shall be ex parte unless the court orders otherwise.

(b) If so ordered by the court, a copy of the petition shall be served on the Attorney General. The Attorney General may answer the petition, at the Attorney General’s discretion.

(c) If the court is satisfied that the claimant has a right to the property claimed, the court shall make an order establishing the right. On presentation of a certified copy of the order, the county auditor shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer for the amount of money covered by the order.

(d) A claim for money distributed in the estate of a deceased person made after the deposit of the property in the State Treasury is governed by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1335) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Distribution to State [11900. - 11904.]

11900.

(a) The court shall order property that is not ordered distributed to known beneficiaries to be distributed to the state.

(b) Insofar as practicable, any real property or tangible personal property shall be converted to money before distribution to the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11901.

If the court orders distribution of property in the decedent’s estate to the state, and the order includes words that otherwise create a trust in favor of unknown or unidentified persons as a class, the distribution shall vest in the state both legal and equitable title to the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11902.

(a) If the court orders distribution to the state, the personal representative shall promptly:

(1) Deliver any money to the State Treasurer.

(2) Deliver any personal property other than money to the Controller for deposit in the State Treasury.

(3) Cause a certified copy of the order to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any real property is located.

(b) At the time of making a delivery of property or recordation under this section, the personal representative shall deliver to the Controller a certified copy of the order for distribution together with a statement of the date and place of each recording and other appropriate recording information.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11903.

(a) Property distributed to the state shall be held by the Treasurer for a period of five years from the date of the order for distribution, within which time any person may claim the property in the manner provided by Title 10 (commencing with Section 1300) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) A person who does not claim the property within the time prescribed in this section is forever barred, and the property vests absolutely in the state, subject to the provisions of Title 10 (commencing with Section 1300) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11904.

No deposit of property in an estate shall be made in the county treasury by a personal representative if any other property in the estate is to be or has been distributed to the state under this chapter, but the property that would otherwise be deposited in the county treasury shall be transmitted promptly to the State Treasurer or Controller as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Partition or Allotment of Property [11950. - 11956.]

11950.

(a) If two or more beneficiaries are entitled to the distribution of undivided interests in property and have not agreed among themselves to a partition, allotment, or other division of the property, any of them, or the personal representative at the request of any of them, may petition the court to make a partition, allotment, or other division of the property that will be equitable and will avoid the distribution of undivided interests.

(b) A proceeding under this chapter is limited to interests in the property that are subject to administration and does not include other interests except to the extent the owners of other interests in the property consent to be bound by the partition, allotment, or other division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11951.

(a) A petition under this chapter may be filed at any time before an order for distribution of the affected property becomes final.

(b) The petition shall:

(1) Describe the property.

(2) State the names of the persons having or claiming undivided interests.

(3) Describe the undivided interests, so far as known to the petitioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11952.

(a) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the personal representative and to the persons entitled to distribution of the undivided interests.

(b) At the hearing the persons entitled to distribution of the undivided interests shall be considered the parties to the proceeding whether or not they have appeared or filed a responsive pleading. No one shall be considered as a plaintiff or as a defendant.

(c) Any objection to the jurisdiction of the court shall be made and resolved in the manner prescribed in Part 19 (commencing with Section 850) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11953.

(a) The court shall partition, allot, or otherwise divide the property so that each party receives property with a value proportionate to the value of the party’s interest in the whole.

(b) The court may direct the personal representative to sell property where, under the circumstances, sale would be more equitable than partition and where the property cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party. The sale shall be conducted in the same manner as other sales made during administration of an estate.

(c) Any two or more parties may agree to accept undivided interests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11954.

(a) The court, in its discretion, may appoint one or three referees to partition property capable of being partitioned, if requested to do so by a party. The number of referees appointed must conform to the request of at least one of the parties.

(b) The referees shall have the powers and perform the duties of referees in, and the court shall have the same powers with respect to their report as in, partition actions under Title 10.5 (commencing with Section 872.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11955.

The expenses of partition shall be equitably apportioned by the court among the parties, but each party must pay the party’s own attorney’s fees. The amount charged to each party shall be included and specified in the order and, to the extent unpaid, constitutes a lien on the property allotted to the party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11956.

(a) The partition, allotment, or other division made by the court shall control in proceedings for distribution, unless modified for good cause on reasonable notice.

(b) The proceedings leading to the partition, allotment, or other division may be reviewed on appeal from the order for distribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Interest and Income Accruing During Administration [12000. - 12007.]

12000.

The provisions of this chapter apply where the intention of the testator is not otherwise indicated by the will.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

If interest is payable under this chapter, the rate of interest is three percentage points less than the legal rate on judgments in effect one year after the date of the testator’s death and shall not be recomputed in the event of a change in the applicable rate thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a specific devise does not bear interest.

(b) A specific devise carries with it income on the devised property from the date of death, less expenses attributable to the devised property during administration of the estate. For purposes of this section, expenses attributable to property are expenses that result directly from the use or ownership of the property, including property tax and tax on the income from the property, but excluding estate and generation-skipping transfer taxes.

(c) If income of specifically devised property is not sufficient to pay expenses attributable to the property, the deficiency shall be paid out of the estate until the property is distributed to the devisee or the devisee takes possession of or occupies the property, whichever occurs first. To the extent a deficiency paid out of the estate is attributable to the period that commences one year after the testator’s death, whether paid during or after expiration of the one year period following the date of death, the amount paid is a charge against the share of the devisee, and the personal representative has an equitable lien on the specifically devised property as against the devisee in the amount paid.

(d) If specifically devised property is sold during administration of the estate, the devisee is entitled to the net income from the property until the date of sale, and to interest on the net sale proceeds thereafter, but no interest accrues during the first year after the testator’s death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

If a general pecuniary devise, including a general pecuniary devise in trust, is not distributed within one year after the testator’s death, the devise bears interest thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

(a) An annuity commences at the testator’s death and shall be paid at the end of the annual, monthly, or other specified period.

(b) If an annuity is not paid at the end of the specified period, it bears interest thereafter, but no interest accrues during the first year after the testator’s death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

A devisee of a devise for maintenance is entitled to interest on the amount of any unpaid accumulations of the payments held by the personal representative on each anniversary of the testator’s death, computed from the date of the anniversary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12006.

Net income received during administration not paid under other provisions of this chapter and not otherwise devised shall be distributed pro rata as income among all distributees who receive either residuary or intestate property. If a distributee takes for life or for a term of years, the pro rata share of income belongs to the tenant for life or for the term of years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12007.

This chapter does not apply in cases where the decedent died before July 1, 1989. In cases where the decedent died before July 1, 1989, the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1989, continues to apply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. CLOSING ESTATE ADMINISTRATION [12200. - 12252.]



  CHAPTER 1. Time for Closing Estate [12200. - 12206.]

12200.

The personal representative shall either petition for an order for final distribution of the estate or make a report of status of administration not later than the following times:

(a) In an estate for which a federal estate tax return is not required, within one year after the date of issuance of letters.

(b) In an estate for which a federal estate tax return is required, within 18 months after the date of issuance of letters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

If a report of status of administration is made under Section 12200:

(a) The report shall show the condition of the estate, the reasons why the estate cannot be distributed and closed, and an estimate of the time needed to close administration of the estate.

(b) The report shall be filed with the court. Notice of hearing of the report shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to persons then interested in the estate, and shall include a statement in not less than 10-point boldface type or a reasonable equivalent thereof if printed, or in all capital letters if not printed, in substantially the following words: “YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO PETITION FOR AN ACCOUNT UNDER SECTION 10950 OF THE CALIFORNIA PROBATE CODE.”

(c) On the hearing of the report, the court may order either of the following: 

(1) That the administration of the estate continue for the time and on the terms and conditions that appear reasonable, including an account under Section 10950, if the court determines that continuation of administration is in the best interests of the estate or of interested persons.

(2) That the personal representative shall petition for final distribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

(a) The court may, on petition of any interested person or on its own motion, for good cause shown on the record, cite the personal representative to appear before the court and show the condition of the estate and the reasons why the estate cannot be distributed and closed.

(b) On the hearing of the citation, the court may either order the administration of the estate to continue or order the personal representative to petition for final distribution, as provided in Section 12201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 563, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, continuation of the administration of the estate in order to pay a family allowance is not in the best interests of the estate or interested persons unless the court determines both of the following:

(1) The family allowance is needed by the recipient to pay for necessaries of life, including education so long as pursued to advantage.

(2) The needs of the recipient for continued family allowance outweigh the needs of the decedent’s beneficiaries whose interests would be adversely affected by continuing the administration of the estate for this purpose.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize continuation of a family allowance beyond the time prescribed in Section 6543.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the power of the court to order a preliminary distribution of the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

Failure of the personal representative to comply with an order made under this chapter is grounds for removal from office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

(a) The court may reduce the compensation of the personal representative or the attorney for the personal representative by an amount the court determines to be appropriate if the court makes all of the following determinations: 

(1) The time taken for administration of the estate exceeds the time required by this chapter or prescribed by the court.

(2) The time taken was within the control of the personal representative or attorney whose compensation is being reduced.

(3) The delay was not in the best interest of the estate or interested persons.

(b) An order under this section reducing compensation may be made regardless of whether the compensation otherwise allowable under Part 7 (commencing with Section 10800) would be reasonable compensation for the services rendered by the personal representative or attorney.

(c) An order under this section may be made at any of the following hearings: 

(1) The hearing for final distribution.

(2) The hearing for an allowance on the compensation of the personal representative or attorney.

(d) In making a determination under this section, the court shall take into account any action taken under Section 12202 as a result of a previous delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 42.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

12206.

A limitation in a will of the time for administration of an estate is directory only and does not limit the power of the personal representative or the court to continue administration of the estate beyond the time limitation in the will if the continuation is necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Discharge of Personal Representative [12250. - 12252.]

12250.

(a) When the personal representative has complied with the terms of the order for final distribution and has filed the appropriate receipts or the court has excused the filing of a receipt as provided in Section 11753, the court shall, on ex parte petition, make an order discharging the personal representative from all liability incurred thereafter.

(b) Nothing in this section precludes discharge of the personal representative for distribution made without prior court order, so long as the terms of the order for final distribution are satisfied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

(a) At any time after appointment of a personal representative and whether or not letters have been issued, if it appears there is no property of any kind belonging to the estate and subject to administration, the personal representative may petition for the termination of further proceedings and for discharge of the personal representative. The petition shall state the facts required by this subdivision.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to all interested persons.

(c) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court on the hearing that the facts stated in the petition are true, the court shall make an order terminating the proceeding and discharging the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

If subsequent administration of an estate is necessary after the personal representative has been discharged because other property is discovered or because it becomes necessary or proper for any other cause, both of the following shall apply:

(a) The court shall appoint as personal representative the person entitled to appointment in the same order as is directed in relation to an original appointment, except that the person who served as personal representative at the time of the order of discharge has priority.

(b) Notice of hearing of the appointment shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the person who served as personal representative at the time of the order of discharge and to other interested persons. If property has been distributed to the State of California, a copy of any petition for subsequent appointment of a personal representative and the notice of hearing shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (AB 1163)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. ADMINISTRATION OF ESTATES OF MISSING PERSONS PRESUMED DEAD [12400. - 12408.]

12400.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, as used in this part, “missing person” means a person who is presumed to be dead under Section 12401.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

In proceedings under this part, a person who has not been seen or heard from for a continuous period of five years by those who are likely to have seen or heard from that person, and whose absence is not satisfactorily explained after diligent search or inquiry, is presumed to be dead. The person’s death is presumed to have occurred at the end of the period unless there is sufficient evidence to establish that death occurred earlier.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

Subject to the provisions of this part, the estate of a missing person may be administered in the manner provided generally for the administration of estates of deceased persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

(a) If the missing person was a resident of this state when last seen or heard from, the superior court of the county of the person’s last known place of residence has jurisdiction for the purposes of this part.

(b) If the missing person was a nonresident of this state when last seen or heard from, the superior court of a county where real property of the missing person is located, or of a county where personal property is located if the missing person has no real property in this state, has jurisdiction for the purposes of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.

(a) A petition may be filed in the court having jurisdiction under Section 12403 for the administration of the estate of a missing person.

(b) The petition may be filed by any person who may be appointed as a personal representative, other than a person described in subdivision (r) of Section 8461.

(c) In addition to the matters otherwise required in a petition for administration of the estate, the petition shall state all of the following:

(1) The last known place of residence and the last known address of the missing person.

(2) The time and circumstances when the missing person was last seen or heard from.

(3) That the missing person has not been seen or heard from for a continuous period of five years by the persons likely to have seen or heard from the missing person (naming them and their relationship to the missing person) and that the whereabouts of the missing person is unknown to those persons and to the petitioner.

(4) A description of the search or the inquiry made concerning the whereabouts of the missing person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.

Notice of hearing shall be served and published, and proof made, in the same manner as in proceedings for administration of the estate of a decedent, except that notice of hearing on the petition shall also be sent by registered mail to the missing person at his or her last known address.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12406.

(a) At the hearing, the court shall determine whether the alleged missing person is a person who is presumed to be dead under Section 12401. The court may receive evidence and consider the affidavits and depositions of persons likely to have seen or heard from or know the whereabouts of the alleged missing person.

(b) If the court is not satisfied that a diligent search or inquiry has been made for the missing person, the court may order the petitioner to conduct a diligent search or inquiry and to report the results. The court may order the search or inquiry to be made in any manner that the court determines to be advisable, including any or all of the following methods:

(1) Inserting in one or more suitable newspapers or other periodicals a notice requesting information from any person having knowledge of the whereabouts of the missing person.

(2) Notifying law enforcement officials and public welfare agencies in appropriate locations of the disappearance of the missing person.

(3) Engaging the services of an investigator.

(c) The costs of a search ordered by the court pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be paid by the estate of the missing person, but if there is no administration, the court in its discretion may order the petitioner to pay the costs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12407.

(a) If the court finds that the alleged missing person is a person presumed to be dead under Section 12401, the court shall do both of the following: 

(1) Appoint a personal representative for the estate of the missing person in the manner provided for the estates of deceased persons.

(2) Determine the date of the missing person’s death.

(b) The personal representative shall administer the estate of the missing person in the same general manner and method of procedure, and with the same force and effect, as provided for the administration of the estates of deceased persons, except as otherwise provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12408.

(a) If the missing person reappears:

(1) The missing person may recover property of the missing person’s estate in the possession of the personal representative, less fees, costs, and expenses thus far incurred.

(2) The missing person may recover from distributees any property of the missing person’s estate that is in their possession, or the value of distributions received by them, to the extent that recovery from distributees is equitable in view of all the circumstances, but an action under this paragraph is forever barred five years after the time the distribution was made.

(b) The remedies available to the missing person under subdivision (a) are exclusive, except for any remedy the missing person may have by reason of fraud or intentional wrongdoing.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), the order for final distribution, when it becomes final, is conclusive as to the rights of the missing person, the rights of the beneficiaries of the missing person, and the rights of all other persons interested in the estate.

(d) If a dispute arises as to the identity of a person claiming to be a reappearing missing person, the person making the claim or any other interested person may file a petition under Section 11700, notwithstanding the limitations of time prescribed in Section 11700, for the determination of the identity of the person claiming to be the reappearing missing person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. NONDOMICILIARY DECEDENTS [12500. - 12591.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [12500. - 12507.]

12500.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

“Ancillary administration” means proceedings in this state for administration of the estate of a nondomiciliary decedent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

“Foreign nation” means a jurisdiction other than a state of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12503.

“Foreign nation personal representative” means a personal representative appointed in a jurisdiction other than a state of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12504.

“Local personal representative” means a nondomiciliary decedent’s personal representative appointed in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12505.

“Nondomiciliary decedent” means a person who dies domiciled in a sister state or foreign nation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12506.

“Sister state” means a state other than this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12507.

“Sister state personal representative” means a personal representative appointed in a sister state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Ancillary Administration [12510. - 12542.]



  ARTICLE 1. Opening Ancillary Administration [12510. - 12513.]

12510.

Any interested person, or a sister state or foreign nation personal representative, may commence an ancillary administration proceeding by a petition to the court for either or both of the following:

(a) Probate of the nondomiciliary decedent’s will.

(b) Appointment of a local personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.

The proper county for an ancillary administration proceeding under this chapter is the county determined pursuant to Section 7052.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12512.

Notice of an ancillary administration proceeding shall be given and, except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 12520), the same proceedings had as in the case of a petition for probate of a will or appointment of a personal representative of a person who dies domiciled in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12513.
